test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kealgal_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩeâlǥal â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩeâlǥal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ǩeâlggla
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩeâlgglest
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩeâlgglin
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Ess+Indef: ǩeâlgglen
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Par+Indef: ǩeâlggled
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâlggaltaa, ǩeâlggaltää]
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩeâlggal
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ǩeâlggli
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩeâlgglid
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩeâlgglid
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩeâlgglin
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩeâlgglivuiʹm
     ǩeâlǥal+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩeâlgglitaa, ǩeâlgglitää]
